Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.010

Declaration of purpose—Budget and accounting by functional categories.

Records of city street expenditures are generally inadequate to meet the needs of cities for planning and administration of their street programs and the needs of the legislature in providing for city street financing. It is the intent of the legislature that each city and town shall budget and thereafter maintain records and accounts for all street expenditures by functional categories in a manner consistent with its size, administrative capabilities, and the amounts of money expended by it for street purposes.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.76.010. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 1.]